Utah statutes.
32B-3-207.   Judicial review -- Enforcement.

(1)  In a disciplinary proceeding, a respondent found in a final order of the commission to have violated this title or rules of the commission made under this title may seek judicial review in a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the judicial review provisions of Sections 63G-4-401 through 63G-4-405.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection 63G-4-403(4)(g), an appellate court may not grant relief on the basis that a finding of fact by the commission in a formal disciplinary proceeding is not supported, if the commission's finding of fact is supported by any evidence of substance in the record of the formal disciplinary proceeding when viewed in light of the whole record before the court.

(3)  In addition to another remedy provided by law, the commission may seek enforcement of a commission order in a disciplinary proceeding by seeking civil enforcement in a state district court in accordance with Section 63G-4-501.

